Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3807
Duty and liability of recorder.

(a) The recorder shall record an amendment submitted under the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records Act, add the amendment to the index, and cross reference the amendment to the document containing the unlawful restriction.

(b) The recorder and the recorder's jurisdiction are not liable for recording an amendment under the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records Act.

Laws 2025, LB21, § 7.